Utah statutes.
62A-2-116.   Violation -- Criminal penalties.
A person who owns, establishes, conducts, maintains, manages, or operates a
human services program in violation of this chapter is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor if the violation endangers or harms the health, welfare, or safety
of persons participating in that program.
